Florida, session 2026, HB1011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 319.324, Florida
34 Statutes, is amended to read:
35 319.324 Odometer fraud prevention and detection; funding.—
36 (1) Moneys received by the department pursuant to s.
37 319.32(1) in the amount of $1 for each original certificate of
38 title, each duplicate copy of a certificate of title, and each
39 assignment by a lienholder shall be deposited into the Highway
40 Safety Operating Trust Fund. There shall also be deposited into
41 the fund moneys received by the department pursuant to s.
42 319.323 in the amount of $5 for each expedited service performed
43 by the department for which a fee is assessed. If the expedited
44 service is performed by the tax collector, the expedited service
45 fee shall be retained by the tax collector, less the general
46 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1).
47 Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 320.031, Florida
48 Statutes, is amended to read:
49 320.031 Mailing of registration certificates, license
50 plates, and validation stickers.—
Page 2 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
51 (2) A mail service charge may be collected for each
52 registration certificate, license plate, mobile home sticker,
53 and validation sticker mailed by the department or any tax
54 collector. Each registration certificate, license plate, mobile
55 home sticker, and validation sticker shall be mailed by first-
56 class mail unless otherwise requested by the applicant. The
57 amount of the mail service charge shall be the actual postage
58 required, rounded to the nearest 5 cents, plus the actual
59 handling cost or actual envelope cost as determined by the tax
60 collector a 25-cent handling charge. The mail service charge is
61 in addition to the service charge provided by s. 320.04. All
62 charges collected by the department under this section shall be
63 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
64 Section 3. Subsection (4) of section 320.072, Florida
65 Statutes, is amended to read:
66 320.072 Additional fee imposed on certain motor vehicle
67 registration transactions.—
68 (4) A tax collector or other authorized agent of the
69 department shall promptly remit all moneys collected pursuant to
70 this section, less a retained service charge of 14.3 percent and
71 any refunds granted pursuant to subsection (3), to the
72 department. The department shall deposit 85.7 percent of such
73 moneys into the State Transportation Trust Fund and 14.3 percent
74 into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. Notwithstanding
75 any other law, the moneys deposited into the State
Page 3 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
76 Transportation Trust Fund pursuant to this subsection shall be
77 used by the Department of Transportation for the following:
78 (a) The Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network
79 established in s. 339.81, $50 million.
80 (b) The capital funding for the New Starts Transit
81 Program, authorized by 49 U.S.C. s. 5309 and pursuant to s.
82 341.051, 3.4 percent.
83 (c) The Small County Outreach Program pursuant to s.
84 339.2818, 5 percent.
85 (d) The Florida Strategic Intermodal System pursuant to
86 ss. 339.61-339.64, 20.6 percent.
87 (e) The Transportation Regional Incentive Program pursuant
88 to s. 339.2819, 6.9 percent.
89 (f) All remaining funds for any transportation purpose
90 authorized by law.
91 Section 4. Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
92 320.08056, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
93 320.08056 Specialty license plates.—
94 (3) Each request must be made annually to the department
95 or an authorized agent serving on behalf of the department,
96 accompanied by the following tax and fees:
97 (b) A processing fee of $5 to be retained by the tax
98 collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth in
99 s. 215.20(1), to be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating
100 Trust Fund.
Page 4 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
101
102 A request may be made any time during a registration period. If
103 a request is made for a specialty license plate to replace a
104 current valid license plate, the specialty license plate must be
105 issued with appropriate decals attached at no tax for the plate,
106 but all fees and service charges must be paid. If a request is
107 made for a specialty license plate at the beginning of the
108 registration period, the tax, together with all applicable fees
109 and service charges, must be paid.
110 Section 5. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (8) of
111 section 322.051, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
112 322.051 Identification cards.—
113 (8)
114 (c) The international symbol for the deaf and hard of
115 hearing shall be exhibited on the identification card of a
116 person who is deaf or hard of hearing upon the payment of an
117 additional $1 fee to be retained by the tax collector for the
118 identification card and the presentation of sufficient proof
119 that the person is deaf or hard of hearing as determined by the
120 department. Until a person's identification card is next
121 renewed, the person may have the symbol added to his or her
122 identification card upon surrender of his or her current
123 identification card, payment of a $2 fee to be retained by the
124 tax collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth
125 in s. 215.20(1) deposited into the Highway Safety Operating
Page 5 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
126 Trust Fund, and presentation of sufficient proof that the person
127 is deaf or hard of hearing as determined by the department. If
128 the applicant is not conducting any other transaction affecting
129 the identification card, a replacement identification card may
130 be issued with the symbol without payment of the fee required in
131 s. 322.21(1)(f)3.c. For purposes of this paragraph, the
132 international symbol for the deaf and hard of hearing is
133 substantially as follows:
134
135
136
137 (d) The department shall include symbols representing the
138 following on an identification card upon the payment of an
139 additional $1 fee, to be retained by the tax collector, by an
140 applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) and
141 presents his or her:
142 1. Lifetime freshwater fishing license;
143 2. Lifetime saltwater fishing license;
144 3. Lifetime hunting license;
145 4. Lifetime sportsman's license; or
146 5. Lifetime boater safety identification card.
147
Page 6 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
148 A person may replace his or her identification card before its
149 expiration date with a card that includes his or her status as a
150 lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon surrender of
151 his or her current identification card, payment of a $2 fee to
152 be retained by the tax collector, less the general revenue
153 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1) to be deposited into
154 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and presentation of the
155 person's lifetime license or card. If the sole purpose of the
156 replacement identification card is the inclusion of the
157 applicant's status as a lifetime licensee or cardholder, the
158 replacement identification card must be issued without payment
159 of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(f)3.c.
160 Section 6. Paragraphs (c) and (e) of subsection (1) of
161 section 322.14, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
162 322.14 Licenses issued to drivers.—
163 (1)
164 (c) The international symbol for the deaf and hard of
165 hearing provided in s. 322.051(8)(c) shall be exhibited on the
166 driver license of a person who is deaf or hard of hearing upon
167 the payment of an additional $1 fee to be retained by the tax
168 collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth in
169 s. 215.20(1), for the license and the presentation of sufficient
170 proof that the person is deaf or hard of hearing as determined
171 by the department. Until a person's license is next renewed, the
172 person may have the symbol added to his or her license upon the
Page 7 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
173 surrender of his or her current license, payment of a $2 fee to
174 be retained by the tax collector, less the general revenue
175 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1) to be deposited into
176 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and presentation of
177 sufficient proof that the person is deaf or hard of hearing as
178 determined by the department. If the applicant is not conducting
179 any other transaction affecting the driver license, a
180 replacement license may be issued with the symbol without
181 payment of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(e).
182 (e) The department shall include symbols representing the
183 following on a driver license upon the payment of an additional
184 $1 fee to be retained by the tax collector, less the general
185 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), by an
186 applicant who meets the requirements of s. 322.08 and presents
187 his or her:
188 1. Lifetime freshwater fishing license;
189 2. Lifetime saltwater fishing license;
190 3. Lifetime hunting license;
191 4. Lifetime sportsman's license; or
192 5. Lifetime boater safety identification card.
193
194 A person may replace his or her driver license before its
195 expiration date with a license that includes his or her status
196 as a lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon
197 surrender of his or her current driver license, payment of a $2
Page 8 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
198 fee to be retained by the tax collector, less the general
199 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1) deposited into
200 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and presentation of the
201 person's lifetime license or identification card. If the sole
202 purpose of the replacement driver license is the inclusion of
203 the applicant's status as a lifetime licensee or cardholder, the
204 replacement driver license must be issued without payment of the
205 fee required in s. 322.21(1)(e).
206 Section 7. Paragraph (c) of subsection (11) and subsection
207 (12) of section 322.20, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
208 322.20 Records of the department; fees; destruction of
209 records.—
210 (11)
211 (c) The clerks of court and tax collectors authorized
212 under s. 322.135, may provide 3-year, 7-year, or complete driver
213 records to any person requesting such records upon payment of
214 the appropriate fees. In addition to the fees authorized under
215 paragraph (a), clerks of court and tax collectors may assess the
216 fee listed in s. 322.135(1)(c) for this service. The applicable
217 record fees listed in paragraph (a) shall be retained by the
218 processing entity, less the general revenue service charge set
219 forth in s. 215.20(1) must be remitted to the department no
220 later than 5 days after payment is received, unless a shorter
221 remittance period is required by law.
222 (12) The fees collected by the department under this
Page 9 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
223 section shall be deposited placed in the Highway Safety
224 Operating Trust Fund.
225 Section 8. Paragraphs (e), (f), and (h) of subsection (1)
226 and subsection (8) of section 322.21, Florida Statutes, are
227 amended to read:
228 322.21 License fees; procedure for handling and collecting
229 fees.—
230 (1) Except as otherwise provided herein, the fee for:
231 (e) A replacement driver license issued pursuant to s.
232 322.17 is $25. Of this amount $7, less the general revenue
233 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), shall be remitted to
234 the tax collector shall be deposited into the Highway Safety
235 Operating Trust Fund and $18 shall be deposited into the General
236 Revenue Fund. Beginning July 1, 2015, or upon completion of the
237 transition of driver license issuance services, if the
238 replacement driver license is issued by the tax collector, the
239 tax collector shall retain the $7 that would otherwise be
240 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund and the
241 remaining revenues shall be deposited into the General Revenue
242 Fund.
243 (f) An original, renewal, or replacement identification
244 card issued pursuant to s. 322.051 is $25.
245 1. An applicant who meets any of the following criteria is
246 exempt from the fee under this paragraph for an original,
247 renewal, or replacement identification card:
Page 10 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
248 a. The applicant presents a valid Florida voter's
249 registration card to the department and attests that he or she
250 is experiencing a financial hardship.
251 b. The applicant presents evidence satisfactory to the
252 department that he or she is homeless as defined in s.
253 414.0252(7).
254 c. The applicant presents evidence satisfactory to the
255 department that his or her annual income is at or below 100
256 percent of the federal poverty level.
257 d. The applicant is a juvenile offender who is in the
258 custody or under the supervision of the Department of Juvenile
259 Justice, who is receiving services pursuant to s. 985.461, and
260 whose identification card is issued by the department's mobile
261 issuing units.
262 2. Pursuant to s. 322.051(10), an applicant who is 80
263 years of age or older and whose driving privilege is denied due
264 to failure to pass a vision test administered pursuant to s.
265 322.18(5) is exempt from the fee under this paragraph for an
266 original identification card.
267 3. Funds collected from fees for original, renewal, or
268 replacement identification cards shall be distributed as
269 follows:
270 a. For an original identification card issued pursuant to
271 s. 322.051, the fee shall be deposited into the General Revenue
272 Fund.
Page 11 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
273 b. For a renewal identification card issued pursuant to s.
274 322.051, $6, less the general revenue service charge set forth
275 in s. 215.20(1), shall be remitted to the tax collector shall be
276 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $19
277 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
278 c. For a replacement identification card issued pursuant
279 to s. 322.051, $9, less the general revenue service charge set
280 forth in s. 215.20(1), shall be remitted to the tax collector
281 shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund,
282 and $16 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
283 Beginning July 1, 2015, or upon completion of the transition of
284 the driver license issuance services, if the replacement
285 identification card is issued by the tax collector, the tax
286 collector shall retain the $9 that would otherwise be deposited
287 into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund and the remaining
288 revenues shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
289 (h) A hazardous-materials endorsement, as required by s.
290 322.57(1)(e), shall be set by the department by rule and must
291 reflect the cost of the required criminal history check,
292 including the cost of the state and federal fingerprint check,
293 and the cost to the department of providing and issuing the
294 license. The fee may shall not exceed $100. The fee shall cover
295 the actual costs of any required criminal history check and the
296 tax collector shall retain $50 of the fee This fee shall be
297 deposited in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. The
Page 12 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
298 department may adopt rules to administer this section.
299 (8) A person who applies for reinstatement following the
300 suspension or revocation of the person's driver license must pay
301 a service fee of $45 following a suspension, and $75 following a
302 revocation, which is in addition to the fee for a license. A
303 person who applies for reinstatement of a commercial driver
304 license following the disqualification or downgrade of the
305 person's privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle must
306 pay a service fee of $75, which is in addition to the fee for a
307 license. The department shall collect all of these fees at the
308 time of reinstatement. The department shall issue proper
309 receipts for such fees and shall promptly transmit all funds
310 received by it as follows:
311 (a) Of the $45 fee received from a licensee for
312 reinstatement following a suspension:
313 1. If the reinstatement is processed by the department,
314 the department shall deposit $15 in the General Revenue Fund and
315 $30 in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
316 2. If the reinstatement is processed by the tax collector,
317 $30 $15, less the general revenue service charge set forth in s.
318 215.20(1), shall be remitted to the tax collector retained by
319 the tax collector, $15 shall be deposited into the Highway
320 Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $15 shall be deposited into the
321 General Revenue Fund.
322 (b) Of the $75 fee received from a licensee for
Page 13 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
323 reinstatement following a revocation, disqualification, or
324 downgrade:
325 1. If the reinstatement is processed by the department,
326 the department shall deposit $35 in the General Revenue Fund and
327 $40 in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
328 2. If the reinstatement is processed by the tax collector,
329 $40 $20, less the general revenue service charge set forth in s.
330 215.20(1), shall be retained by the tax collector, $20 shall be
331 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $35
332 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.
333
334 If the revocation or suspension of the driver license was for a
335 violation of s. 316.193, or for refusal to submit to a lawful
336 breath, blood, or urine test, an additional fee of $130 must be
337 charged. However, only one $130 fee may be collected from one
338 person convicted of violations arising out of the same incident.
339 The department shall collect the $130 fee and remit such fee,
340 less the general revenue service charge set forth in s.
341 215.20(1), to the tax collector deposit the fee into the Highway
342 Safety Operating Trust Fund at the time of reinstatement of the
343 person's driver license, but the fee may not be collected if the
344 suspension or revocation is overturned. If the revocation or
345 suspension of the driver license was for a conviction for a
346 violation of s. 817.234(8) or (9) or s. 817.505, an additional
347 fee of $180 is imposed for each offense. The department shall
Page 14 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
348 collect and remit such fee, less the general revenue service
349 charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), to the tax collector deposit
350 the additional fee into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund
351 at the time of reinstatement of the person's driver license.
352 Section 9. Subsection (2) of section 322.29, Florida
353 Statutes, is amended to read:
354 322.29 Surrender and return of license.—
355 (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), an examination is not
356 required for the return of a license suspended under s. 318.15
357 or s. 322.245 unless an examination is otherwise required by
358 this chapter. A person applying for the return of a license
359 suspended under s. 318.15 or s. 322.245 must present to the
360 department certification from the court that he or she has
361 complied with all obligations and penalties imposed pursuant to
362 s. 318.15 or, in the case of a suspension pursuant to s.
363 322.245, that he or she has complied with all directives of the
364 court and the requirements of s. 322.245 and shall pay to the
365 department a nonrefundable service fee of $60, of which $37.50
366 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund and $22.50
367 shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund.
368 If reinstated by the clerk of the court or tax collector, the
369 fee shall be retained by the processing entity $37.50 shall be
370 retained and $22.50 shall be remitted to the Department of
371 Revenue for deposit into the Highway Safety Operating Trust
372 Fund. However, the service fee is not required if the person is
Page 15 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
373 required to pay a $45 fee or $75 fee under s. 322.21(8).
374 Section 10. Subsection (3) of section 324.0221, Florida
375 Statutes, is amended to read:
376 324.0221 Reports by insurers to the department; suspension
377 of driver license and vehicle registrations; reinstatement.—
378 (3) An operator or owner whose driver license or
379 registration has been suspended under this section or s. 316.646
380 may affect its reinstatement upon compliance with the
381 requirements of this section and upon payment to the department
382 or tax collector of a nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $150
383 for the first reinstatement. The reinstatement fee is $250 for
384 the second reinstatement and $500 for each subsequent
385 reinstatement during the 3 years following the first
386 reinstatement. A person reinstating her or his insurance under
387 this subsection must also secure coverage as described in ss.
388 324.021(8), 324.023, and 627.7275(2) and present to the
389 appropriate person proof that the coverage is in force on a form
390 adopted by the department, and such proof shall be maintained
391 for 2 years. If the person does not have a second reinstatement
392 within 3 years after her or his initial reinstatement, the
393 reinstatement fee is $150 for the first reinstatement after that
394 3-year period. If a person's license and registration are
395 suspended under this section or s. 316.646, only one
396 reinstatement fee must be paid to reinstate the license and the
397 registration. All fees shall be collected by the department or
Page 16 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
398 tax collector at the time of reinstatement. The department or
399 tax collector shall issue proper receipts for such fees. The
400 department and shall promptly deposit the those fees in the
401 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund and the tax collector shall
402 retain the fees, less the general revenue service charge set
403 forth in s. 215.20(1). One-third of the fees collected under
404 this subsection shall be distributed from the Highway Safety
405 Operating Trust Fund or tax collector to the local governmental
406 entity or state agency that employed the law enforcement officer
407 seizing the license plate pursuant to s. 324.201. The funds may
408 be used by the local governmental entity or state agency for any
409 authorized purpose.
410 Section 11. Section 324.071, Florida Statutes, is amended
411 to read:
412 324.071 Reinstatement; renewal of license; reinstatement
413 fee.—Any operator or owner whose license or registration has
414 been suspended pursuant to s. 324.051(2), s. 324.072, s.
415 324.081, or s. 324.121 may effect its reinstatement upon
416 compliance with the provisions of s. 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., or
417 s. 324.081(2) and (3), as the case may be, and with one of the
418 provisions of s. 324.031 and upon payment to the department or
419 tax collector of a nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $15. The
420 fee shall be retained by the processing entity, less the general
421 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). Only one such
422 fee shall be paid by any one person irrespective of the number
Page 17 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1011 2026
423 of licenses and registrations to be then reinstated or issued to
424 such person. All such fees shall be deposited to a department
425 trust fund. When the reinstatement of any license or
426 registration is effected by compliance with s. 324.051(2)(a)3.
427 or 4., the department shall not renew the license or
428 registration within a period of 3 years from such reinstatement,
429 nor shall any other license or registration be issued in the
430 name of such person, unless the operator is continuing to comply
431 with one of the provisions of s. 324.031.
432 Section 12. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 18 of 18
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1011-00